Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
Article 10 Effective Date and Repealer

11-10-101.
Effective date.

This title shall become effective at 12:01 A.M. on January 1, 1964. It applies to transactions entered into and events occurring on and after that time and date.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-10—101, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 188, § 37.

11-10-102.
Provision for transition.

Transactions validly entered into before the effective date specified in Code Section 11-10-101 and the rights, duties, and interests flowing from them remain valid thereafter and may be terminated, completed, consummated, or enforced as required or permitted by any statute or other law amended or repealed by this title as though such repeal or amendment had not occurred.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-10—102, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-10-103.
Certain Code sections superseded in part.

The provisions of the following chapters of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, as amended, shall yield to and be superseded by any provisions of this title which conflict therewith:

Article 2 of Chapter 14 of Title 44, relating to mortgages.

Article 4 of Chapter 14 of Title 44, relating to mortgages and bills of sale for crops.

Article 3 of Chapter 14 of Title 44, relating to conveyances to secure debt.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-10—103.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 188, § 39.

11-10-104.
Certain statutory remedies retained.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary stated in any of the following chapters of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, as amended, the remedies provided by such chapters shall not restrict the remedies otherwise available to a secured party under this title, but all such remedies shall be cumulatively available in accordance with the respective terms to a secured party under this title:

Code Section 44-14-49, relating to foreclosures in equity.

Subparts 1 and 2 of Part 4 of Article 7 of Chapter 14 of Title 44, relating to applications to foreclose.

Subpart 4 of Part 4 of Article 7 of Chapter 14 of Title 44, relating to the procedure for foreclosure of mortgages on personalty in justices’ courts.

Code Sections 44-14-238 through 44-14-241, relating to the foreclosure of mortgages on personalty before debts become due.

Subpart 3 of Part 4 of Article 7 of Chapter 14 of Title 44, relating to foreclosure of bills of sale to secure debt and conditional sales contracts.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-10—103.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 188, § 39.

11-10-105.
Laws not repealed.

The article on documents of title (Article 7 of this title) does not repeal or modify any laws prescribing the form or contents of documents of title or the services or facilities to be afforded by bailees, or otherwise regulating bailees’ businesses in respects not specifically dealt with herein; but the fact that such laws are violated does not affect the status of a document of title which otherwise complies with the definition of a document of title (Code Section 11-1-201).

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-10—105, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 188, § 40; Ga. L. 1991, p. 810, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1323, § 19.